apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
<k ambrik "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ambrium "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ambut "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amelia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amera "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amerad "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amerawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amfer "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amfor "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amhar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ampiun "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ampung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ampus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amrad "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amsen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amuflase "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k amus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k an "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ana "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anaat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anak "-" kanak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k analisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancera "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancing "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ancut "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anda "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andela "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andidat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andul "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k andung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ane "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angka "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angkang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angkung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angmas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angsa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angsar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k angtau "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anguru "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anibal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anibalisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anibalisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anigara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anilem "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anina "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anisah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anjar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anjeng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anji "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anker "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ano "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anoman "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anonir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anopi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ans "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ansel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anselari "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anselir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anser "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anstof "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antata "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antih "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antilever "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anto "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antong "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antor "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antuk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k antung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anun "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anvas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k anyon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aolin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aos "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apak "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aparinyo "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apasitans "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apasitas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apasitor "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apela "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aper "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k api "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apilaritas "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apiler "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apita "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apital "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitalis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitalisme "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitulasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apitulum "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aplares "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apling "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aporit "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k appa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aprikornus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apsalon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apsel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apstan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apster "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apstok "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apsul "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apten "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apuk "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apur "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k apurancang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ara "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arabin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k araeng "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k araf "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aragen "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arahah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arakter "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arakterisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arakterologi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aramba "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arambol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aramel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arang "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arangkitri "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arantina "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arantinawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arapaks "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arapan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbohidrase "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbohidrat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arboksil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbolat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbon "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbonado "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbonan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbonat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbonil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arbonisasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arborundum "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arburasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arburator "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arcis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardamunggu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardil "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardinal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardiograf "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardiografi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardiogram "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardiolog "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardiologi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arditis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k ardus "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arengga "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aret "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artika "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artilago "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artografi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artogram "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arton "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artonase "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artotek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artu "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artun "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k artunis "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aruhun "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arun "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arung "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arunia "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k arya "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryasiswa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryawan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryawati "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aryawisata "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k as "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asa "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asab "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asabandiah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asad "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asai "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asam "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asap "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asar "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asau "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asein "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asemat "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asemek "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aserin "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aserol "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aset "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asid "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asidah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asih "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asihan "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k askade "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k askaya "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asmir "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k aspe "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asrah "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asregister "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asta "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k astal "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k astanyet "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k astel "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k asti "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k astrasi "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
<k astroli "@P.POS.n@">        InflectionOption ;
